Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-320
Director of Veterans' Homes; rules and regulations.

Nothing in sections 80-314 to 80-331 shall be construed as limiting the authority vested with the Director of Veterans' Homes to adopt and promulgate rules and regulations, not inconsistent herewith, for the administration of the Nebraska veterans homes. The Department of Health and Human Services, in conjunction and after consultation with the Veterans' Homes Board, shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations governing admission to and administration of the homes.

Laws 1909, c. 134, § 1, p. 482;

R.S.1913, § 7306;

C.S.1922, § 6961;

C.S.1929, § 80-305;

R.S.1943, § 80-305;

Laws 1949, c. 272, § 4(3), p. 894;

Laws 1953, c. 325, § 3, p. 1077;

Laws 1980, LB 184, § 7;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 833;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 80-307;

Laws 1997, LB 396, § 9;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 723.